North Carolina statutes. Chapter 67. Dogs.
Article 5. Protection of Livestock and Poultry from Ranging Dogs.

§ 67-30.
Appointment of animal control officers authorized; salary, etc.

A county may appoint one or more animal control officers and may fix their salaries, allowances, and expenses.

History.

1951, c. 931, s. 1; 1955, c. 1333, s. 1; 1957, cc. 81, 840; 1973, c. 822, s. 6.

Local Modification.

Cabarrus: 1979, c. 119; Forsyth: 1967, c. 587, s. 2; Franklin: 1953, c. 1005; Granville: 1965, c. 464, s. 2; Rowan: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 872.

§ 67-31.
Powers and duties of dog warden.

The powers and duties of the county dog warden shall be as follows:

He shall have the power of arrest and be responsible for the enforcement within his county of all public and public-local laws pertaining to the ownership and control of dogs, and shall cooperate with all other law-enforcement officers operating within the county in fulfilling this responsibility.

In those counties having a rabies control officer, the county dog warden shall act as assistant to the rabies control officer, working under the supervision of the county health department, to collect the dog tax. In those counties having no rabies control officer, the county dog warden shall serve as rabies control officer.

History.

1951, c. 931, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Chowan: 1983, c. 166; Cumberland: 1967, c. 814; Dare: 1983, c. 166; Edgecombe: 1983, c. 683; Orange: 1953, c. 367, ss. 1-5, 8; Pasquotank: 1983, c. 166.

§ 67-32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 891, s. 9.

§§ 67-33 through 67-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to the effect of the repeal, see the Editor’s note under

G.S. 153A-1

.

§ 67-36.
Article supplements existing laws.

The provisions of this Article are to be construed as supplementing and not repealing existing State laws pertaining to the ownership, taxation, and control of dogs.

History.

1951, c. 931, s. 7.

Local Modification.

Chowan, Dare, Pasquotank: 1983, c. 166.